Washington statutes.
RCW 19.142.100

Violations—Application of consumer protection act.

A violation of this chapter constitutes an unfair or deceptive act or practice and is a per se violation of the consumer protection act, chapter 19.86 RCW.

[ 1987 c 317 s 11.]